District of Columbia statutes.
32-1231.11

Penalties.

(a)

An employer who willfully violates § 32-1231.03 shall be subject to a civil penalty of $ 1,000 for the 1st offense, $ 1,500 for the 2nd offense, and $ 2,000 for the 3rd and each subsequent offense.

(b)

An employer who fails to post the notice of rights as required by § 32-1231.04(a) shall be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $ 50 for each day that the employer fails to post the notice; provided, that the total penalty shall not exceed $ 250, unless the ongoing violation is willful.

Mar. 3, 2015, D.C. Law 20-168, § 12, 61 DCR 11368